Tennessee, session 114, HB0198.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. This act is known and may be cited as the "Bearing Witness to the Death
Penalty Act."
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-23-116(a), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) Members of the general assembly;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0198
001813
- 1 -